Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.215

Withdrawal of filed record before effectiveness.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a filed record may be withdrawn before it takes effect by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of withdrawal.

(2) A statement of withdrawal must:

(a) Be executed by an individual acting in a valid representative capacity; and

(b) Identify the filed record to be withdrawn.

(3) On filing by the secretary of state of a statement of withdrawal, the action or transaction evidenced by the original filed record shall not take effect.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1204.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.